Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1410
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 52-1401 to 52-1410 shall be construed to negate or affect the provisions of Chapter 52, articles 2, 5, 7, 9, 11, 12, and 15, and Chapter 54, article 2.

Laws 1987, LB 101, § 10.